Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1022.02
School fiscal year 2023-24 certifications null and void.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027 completed prior to June 1, 2023, for school fiscal year 2023-24 are null and void.

Laws 2002, LB 898, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 540, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 42;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB633, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB119, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB430, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB880, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB583, § 6.